Washington statutes.
RCW 18.16.220

Appeal—Procedure.

Any person aggrieved by the refusal of the director to issue any license provided for in this chapter, or to renew the same, or by the revocation or suspension of any license issued under this chapter or by the application of any penalty under RCW 18.16.210, shall have the right to appeal the decision of the director to the superior court of the county in which the person maintains his or her place of business. Such appeal shall be filed within thirty days of the director's decision.

[ 1984 c 208 s 15.]